Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6061HH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2173 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 330.25 Weather engineering devices. 1 1. For purposes of this section: 2 a. âAircraftâ means a powered or unpowered machine or device 3 capable of atmospheric transportation, except a parachute or 4 other such device used primarily as safety equipment. 5 b. âDepartmentâ means the department of transportation. 6 2. By the first day of each month beginning October 1, 2026, 7 all airport commissions, local authorities, or any other entity 8 who operates an airport open to public use shall report to the 9 department, using a method determined by the department, all 10 of the following: 11 a. The physical presence of any aircraft located on an 12 airport open to public use, equipped with any part, component, 13 device, or the like that may be used to support the intentional 14 emission, injection, release, or dispersion of air contaminants 15 into the atmosphere within the borders of this state when such 16 emission, injection, release, or dispersion occurs for the 17 express purpose of affecting temperature, weather, climate, or 18 the intensity of sunlight. 19 b. The landing, takeoff, stopover, or refueling of an 20 aircraft equipped with a part, component, device, or the like 21 described in paragraph âaâ on the physical location of the 22 airport open to public use. 23 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 24 contrary, a project or program located on or in support of an 25 airport open to public use that is not in compliance with this 26 section shall be ineligible to receive any state funding until 27 such time as the entity becomes compliant with this section. 28 4. Upon receipt of reports required in subsection 1, the 29 department shall submit aggregated reports to the department 30 of natural resources and the applicable state law enforcement 31 agency in support of the enforcement of section 708C.1. 32 5. The department shall incorporate reporting guidelines 33 in all grant agreements for airports open to public use that 34 receive state funding. 35 -1- LSB 6061HH (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 H.F. 2173 6. The department shall adopt rules as necessary to 1 implement this section. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 708C.1 Weather engineering. 3 1. The emission, injection, release, or dispersion, by any 4 means, of a chemical, a chemical compound, a substance, or an 5 apparatus into the atmosphere within the borders of this state 6 for the express purpose of affecting the temperature, weather, 7 climate, or intensity of sunlight, or any other purpose not 8 presently regulated by state or federal law, is prohibited. 9 2. a. Any person, including any public or private 10 corporation, who violates this section commits a class âDâ 11 felony. For a corporation in violation of this section, the 12 officers, directors, or employees of the corporation shall 13 also be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred 14 thousand dollars. 15 b. Each day a violation of subsection 1 occurs constitutes a 16 separate offense. 17